Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-894
Interstate bridges; application of sections; restrictions.

The provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 shall apply to all interstate bridges on the state highway system, including interstate bridges upon the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways built with funds of the United States appropriated in an amount exceeding fifty percent of the cost thereof. The provisions of sections 39-891 to 39-8,122 shall not be applicable to any boundary line bridge or boundary line toll bridge, and shall in no manner affect any law of the State of Nebraska concerning such bridges; Provided, that such bridges may be purchased or acquired by the department in the manner provided by the provisions of sections 39-8,116 to 39-8,118.

Laws 1959, c. 175, § 4, p. 635.